Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 3
GREEN TRUCK GRANT PROGRAM

42-1-301 to 42-1-305. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire part repealed, (HB 12-1315), ch. 224, p. 984, § 55, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This part 3 was added in 2009 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2012. For the text of this part 3 prior to 2012, consult the 2011 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.